Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.145

Powers and duties of regents—Regents' spending limited by income.

The board of regents are hereby prohibited from creating any debt or in any manner encumbering the university beyond its capacity for payment thereof from the biennial income of the university for the then current biennium.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.145. Prior: 1890 p 399 s 20; RRS s 4566. Formerly RCW 28.77.170.]